Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Odd Fellows

48-102-101. General powers of grand lodge.

The officers of the grand lodge of the state of Tennessee, of the Independent Order of Odd Fellows, and their regular successors, are a body politic and corporate, by the name and style of “The Grand Lodge of the Independent Order of Odd Fellows of the State of Tennessee” and, by that name, are invested with power to acquire, possess, occupy, and enjoy real and personal estate, and to sell and convey, or otherwise dispose of the same under the bylaws, rules, and regulations of the lodge; provided, that such bylaws, rules and regulations shall not be contrary to the constitutions of the United States and of this state.

The corporation, in its name, shall be competent to contract and be contracted with; to sue and be sued, plead and be impleaded, in all courts; to have and use a common seal and to alter the same at its pleasure.

The right of any future general assembly to alter, repeal, or amend this part is expressly reserved.

Acts 1845-1846, ch. 69, §§ 1, 2; 1847-1848, ch. 60, § 1; Shan., § 2577a4; mod. Code 1932, § 4419; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1501, 48-4-101.

Cross-References. Acts of incorporation left unrepealed, § 1-2-105.

Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Application of nonprofit corporation law, title 48, chs. 51-67, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Excise tax exemption of corporations formed to own meeting places, § 67-4-2008.

Fraternal benefit societies, title 56, ch. 25.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 2; 5 Tenn. Juris., Beneficial and Benevolent Associations, §§ 2, 9.

48-102-102. Power of grand lodge over property.

The grand lodge is empowered to acquire by purchase, deed, gift, devise, bequest, or otherwise, and to hold, sell, convey, mortgage, bond or otherwise dispose of or encumber any and all property, real and personal, that it may deem necessary for any legitimate purpose of its organization; provided, that such property is, in the opinion of the grand lodge, necessary or convenient in the execution of the objects and purposes of the grand lodge.

Acts 1925, ch. 136, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 2577a8; Code 1932, § 4423; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1502, 48-4-102.

48-102-103. Subordinate lodges — Power to acquire and hold or convey property.

The various subordinate lodges of the grand lodge shall be, and each thereof is, empowered to acquire and hold by purchase, deed, gift, devise, bequest, or otherwise any and all property, real and personal, necessary or deemed expedient or proper by the subordinate lodges for the legitimate and proper execution of their objects and purposes, and each and all of the subordinate lodges are empowered to sell, convey, mortgage, bond, or otherwise convey or encumber for lodge purposes, any and all of such property.

The subordinate lodges may sell or convey their real property only by and with the permission of the grand lodge, or the grand master.

Acts 1925, ch. 136, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 2577a9; Code 1932, § 4424; Acts 1957, ch. 359, § 1; 1967, ch. 38, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1503, 48-4-103.

48-102-104. Separate property of subordinate lodges.

Whenever the grand lodge shall establish or charter a subordinate lodge, the subordinate lodge is invested with the separate right to an amount of real and personal property, to the same extent and under the restrictions of § 48-102-101. The subordinate lodges have the power, and are specifically authorized, to mortgage or convey in trust their real estate for the purpose of securing the payment of notes or bonds for borrowed money or for other purposes, and it shall be sufficient to bind any lodge in such transaction when a mortgage or deed of trust shall be duly executed by the noble grand and secretary of the lodge.

Acts 1847-1848, ch. 60, § 2; 1907, ch. 595, § 1; Shan., § 2577a5; mod. Code 1932, § 4420; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1504, 48-4-104.

48-102-105. Control of property — Conveyances.

Any and all property, real or personal, owned or held by the grand lodge, and all subordinate lodges thereof, irrespective of the amount of property, shall be held, owned, controlled, enjoyed, and disposed of, or encumbered by those bodies, with all the rights and privileges provided for herein, and no question shall be made of the amount, kind, or character of such property, or the manner of its acquisition or its right to hold the same according to the title or interest vested in the body or bodies.

The subordinate lodges may sell or convey their real property only by and with the permission of the grand lodge or the grand master.

Acts 1925, ch. 136, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 2577a12; Code 1932, § 4427; Acts 1957, ch. 359, § 2; 1967, ch. 38, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1505, 48-4-105.

48-102-106. Execution and record of evidences of indebtedness.

It shall be sufficient for any mortgages, notes, bonds, debentures, or other evidence of indebtedness, or any security executed for or on behalf of the lodges, grand or subordinate, to be executed by such officers as their bylaws may provide, or such officers as the lodges may direct by appropriate action, a record of which shall be made on the minutes or records of the lodge or lodges.

Acts 1925, ch. 136, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 2577a11; Code 1932, § 4426; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1506, 48-4-106.

48-102-107. Construction and maintenance of buildings by lodges.

The grand lodge and each subordinate lodge are empowered to erect and maintain all necessary and suitable buildings, halls, lodge rooms, hospitals, homes for widows and orphans of deceased members, and all other buildings or plants necessary or deemed expedient in the execution of the objects and purposes of the organization, and to collect and apply all rents and income derived from any and all such property; provided, that the application be had in furtherance of the objects and purposes of the organization.

Acts 1925, ch. 136, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 2577a10; Code 1932, § 4425; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1507, 48-4-107.

48-102-108. Liquidation of subordinate lodges.

Whenever the authority establishing the subordinate lodge is withdrawn, and the separate existence of the subordinate lodge is destroyed, the property of the lodge shall be placed in the hands of a trustee appointed by the grand lodge from the members of the subordinate lodge or from the members of any other subordinate lodge in Tennessee, to pay its debts and liabilities. The residue of the real estate, if there is any, shall be applied by the trustee, as may be prescribed by the bylaws or resolutions of the grand lodge.

Acts 1847-1848, ch. 60, § 3; Shan., § 2577a6; Code 1932, § 4421; Acts 1957, ch. 359, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1508, 48-4-108.